Utah statutes.
24-1-2.   Purpose.
It is the intent of this chapter to:
(1)  provide a uniform set of procedures and substantive standards for the
criminal and civil forfeiture of property within the state of Utah;
(2)  permit law enforcement personnel to deter crime by lawfully seizing and
forfeiting contraband and the instrumentalities and proceeds of criminal
conduct;
(3)  protect innocent owners and innocent interest holders from the forfeiture
of their property;
(4)  ensure that seizures and forfeitures of property from private citizens
are in proportion to the violation or crime committed;
(5)  ensure direct control and accountability over the use and sale of
forfeited property and the revenue resulting from the disposal of forfeited
property;
(6)  ensure the revenue resulting from property forfeiture allows continued:
(a)  law enforcement, crime prevention, and drug courts; and
(b)  other appropriate activities related to the functions under Subsection
(6)(a);
(7)  maximize the benefits of, and accountability for, federal asset
forfeiture sharing for the citizens of the state; and
(8)  direct that any and all revenues resulting from the sale of forfeited
property be allocated to the Utah Commission on Criminal and Juvenile Justice
for grants to state and local law enforcement agencies according to specified
guidelines.
